Rhode Island statutes. Title 41 Sports, Racing, and Athletics
Chapter 10 Offtrack Betting

41-10-1.
License required for offtrack betting.

No person, association, or corporation shall hold or conduct offtrack betting on any racing event for any stake, purse, or reward, except a person, association, or corporation as shall be licensed by the division of gaming and athletics licensing, as provided by this chapter, and as approved by the voters, as required by this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 512, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 151; P.L. 2016, ch. 528, § 7.

41-10-2.
City elections on establishment of offtrack betting.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, before an offtrack betting facility shall be established in the city of Pawtucket, the question “Shall an offtrack betting facility be located in the city of Pawtucket, the state proceeds from which shall be paid directly to the cities and towns for the relief of property taxes?”

This resolution shall be placed on the ballot at the next general election to be submitted to the qualified electors of the city of Pawtucket, and the state.

The question shall be submitted by the local board of canvassers to the electors of the city of Pawtucket, and the results of the election shall be certified to the secretary of state.

The question shall be submitted by the secretary of state to the qualified electors of the state at the same general election and the secretary of state shall certify the election results.

The affirmative vote of the city of Pawtucket and the electors of the state shall be necessary for the approval of the question, and if such consent be thus given, all further regulations shall rest with the division of gaming and athletics licensing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 512, § 1.

41-10-3.
Application for license — Action by division of gaming and athletics licensing.

Any person, association, or corporation desiring to conduct pari-mutuel wagering at an offtrack betting facility on any racing event shall apply to the division for a license on forms provided by the division. The application shall specify the days on which betting is to be conducted; the location of the betting facility; and other information as may be required by the division. The division may also require any person, association, or corporation to give information as to their or its financial standing and credit. The division shall have the right to reject any applications for a license for any cause that it may deem sufficient. Applicants aggrieved by a decision or order of the division shall have the right to an appeal to the racing and athletics board pursuant to chapter 2 of this title. The division shall allow an offtrack betting facility to be open seven (7) days a week. On each day of the week, the offtrack facility licensee may import racing programs from one or more out-of-state racetracks in a manner to be approved by the division.

Definition of an “offtrack betting facility”: An offtrack betting facility shall be a full-service betting facility offering foods and beverage services plus other amenities, containing a minimum of ten thousand square feet (10,000 sq. ft.), providing audio/visual signals of horse racing programs via approved telecommunication and totalizator systems.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 512, § 1.

41-10-4.
Powers and duties of division.

In addition to the powers already granted to the division, the division shall have the power and it shall be its duty to supervise and administer the operation of offtrack betting in accordance with this chapter and with the rules and regulations of the division.

History of Section.

P.L 1990, ch. 512, § 1.

41-10-5.
Licensing restrictions.

The division shall refuse to grant a license, or shall suspend a license, if the applicant or licensee:

Has been convicted of a felony;

Has engaged in illegal gambling as a significant source of income;

Has been convicted of violating any gambling statutes;

Has been convicted of fraud or misrepresentation in any connection; or

Has been found to have violated any rule, regulation, or order of the division.

The license heretofore issued shall be suspended by the division for any charge that may result in a conviction or conduct prescribed in subsections (a)(1) through (a)(5); which suspension shall be effective until a final judicial determination.

The division shall refuse to grant, or the division shall suspend, pending a hearing before the division, a license if the applicant or licensee is an association or corporation:

Any of whose directors, officers, partners, or shareholders holding a five percent (5%) or greater interest have been found guilty of any of the activities specified in subsection (a); or

In which it appears to the division that due to the experience, character, or general fitness of any director, officer, or controlling partner, or shareholder, the granting of a license would be inconsistent with the public interest, convenience, or trust.

Whenever requested by the division, the division of criminal identification of the department of the attorney general, the superintendent of state police, and the superintendent or chief of police or town sergeant of any city or town, shall furnish all information on convictions, arrests, and present investigations concerning any person who is an applicant for a license or who is a licensee under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 512, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 151; P.L. 2021, ch. 400, § 25, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 401, § 25, effective July 13, 2021.

41-10-6.
Host community fee.

The city of Pawtucket shall receive as host community fee one percent (1%) of the amount contributed to the mutuel pools.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 512, § 1.

41-10-7.
Offtrack betting taxes and commissions.

Each licensee conducting wagering in an offtrack betting facility under the pari-mutuel system shall pay to the state, and there is hereby imposed, a tax on such events at the rate of:

Three and one-half percent (3.5%) of the total money wagered thereon on win, place, and show wagers;

Four percent (4%) on multiple wagers therein involving two (2) animals; and

Four and one-half percent (4.5%) on exotic wagers therein involving three (3) or more animals.

Where the division has approved the commingling of wagers placed at the offtrack betting facility into similar wagering pools at a host facility where the racing event is conducted, each licensee conducting wagering in an offtrack betting facility may retain as his or her licensee’s commission an amount equal to the takeout at the host facility. Where commingling of wagers does not occur the division shall be:

Eighteen percent (18%) of the amount wagered therein on win, place, and show wagers;

Twenty percent (20%) on multiple wagers therein involving two (2) animals;

Twenty-five percent (25%) on exotic wagers therein involving three (3) or more animals; and

One-half (1/2) of the breakage to the dime resulting from the betting shall be paid to the division to support the division in accordance with §

41-4-4.1

. The remaining breakage shall be retained by the licensee.

Offtrack betting licensees may impose a surcharge on winning wagers of up to five and one-half percent (5.5%) to offset telecommunications costs and the cost of acquiring racing signals.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 512, § 1.

41-10-8.
Payment by state to cities and towns — State aid formula.

The offtrack betting tax payable to the state under §

41-10-7(a)(1)

, (2), and (3) shall be paid directly by the state to the cities and towns of the state in accordance with the state aid formula as set out in §

45-13-1

, and these funds shall be used by the cities and towns as a direct reduction against the residential tax rate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 512, § 1.